California statutes. Elections Code
(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 791, Sec. 5.   (AB 2584)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11043.

(a) The petition sections shall be designed so that each signer shall personally affix all of the following:

(1) The signer’s signature.

(2) The signer’s printed name.

(3) The signer’s residence address, giving street and number, or if no street or number exists, adequate designation of residence so that the location may be readily ascertained.

(4) The name of the incorporated city or unincorporated community in which the signer resides.

(5) If the petition does not include the disclosure statement described by subdivision (b) of Section 107, the following text on a separate horizontal line below the signer’s printed name and above the signer’s signature: “DO NOT SIGN UNLESS you have seen Official Top Funders sheet and its month is still valid.” The text “DO NOT SIGN UNLESS” shall be in all capitals and in boldface. The other text shall be capitalized as shown and shall not be in boldface.

(b) A margin, at least one inch wide, shall be left blank across the top of each page of the petition. A margin, at least one-half
 inch wide, shall be left blank along the bottom of each page of the petition.

(c) A space, at least one inch wide, shall be left blank after each name for the use of the elections official in verifying the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 887, Sec. 8.   (SB 1360)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11043.5.

(a) The Secretary of State shall provide to county elections officials a recall petition format for distribution to proponents of a recall. The recall petition format shall be made available upon request by the county elections official and by the Secretary of State.

(b) The recall petition format made available pursuant to this section shall be utilized by proponents of a recall election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 714, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

11044.

Separate petitions are necessary to propose the recall of each officer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11045.

Only registered voters of the electoral jurisdiction of the officer sought to be recalled are qualified to sign a recall petition for that officer. A person who meets the requirements of Section 102 may circulate the petition.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 278, Sec. 27.   (SB 213)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

11046.

To each section of a petition shall be attached a declaration, signed by the circulator thereof, that complies with Section 104.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 278, Sec. 28.   (SB 213)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

11047.

When a petition is circulated in more than one county for the recall of an officer, each section of the petition shall bear the name of the county for which it is circulated, and only registered voters of that county may sign that section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 156, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Recall of State Officers: Intermediate Steps in the Recall [11100. - 11110.]

11100.

(a) This chapter applies only to the recall of state officers.

(b) In addition to this chapter, Sections 13 to 18, inclusive, of Article II of the California Constitution and the applicable provisions of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 11000) and Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11300) shall govern the recall of state officers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 62.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

11101.

Unless and until it is otherwise proven upon official investigation, it shall be presumed that the petition presented contains the signatures of the requisite number of registered voters.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 714, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

11102.

Each section of a recall petition shall be filed with the elections official of the county for which it was circulated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 156, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

11103.

Each section of the petition shall be filed by the proponents or by any person or persons authorized, in writing, by a proponent. Each time an authorized person or persons files a section or sections of a petition, a copy of the written authorization shall be submitted to the elections official.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 714, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

11104.

(a) The elections official, 30 days after a recall has been initiated and every 30 days thereafter, or more frequently at the discretion of the elections official, shall report to the Secretary of State all of the following:

(1) The number of signatures submitted on the recall petition sections for the period ending five days previously, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays.

(2) The cumulative total of all signatures received since the time the recall was initiated and through the period ending five days previously, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays.

(3) The number of valid
 signatures, verified pursuant to subdivision (b), submitted during the previous reporting period, and of valid signatures verified during the current reporting period.

(4) The cumulative total of all valid signatures received since the time the recall was initiated and ending five days previously, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays.

(b) Signatures shall be verified in the same manner set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 9031.

(c) The elections official, at the end of each 30-day period, shall attach to the petition a form provided by the Secretary of State, properly dated, that includes the information required by subdivision (a), and submit a copy of the petition, except as to the signatures appended thereto, to the Secretary of State and file a copy of the form in his or her office.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (a) and (b), and Section 11106, the elections official shall not be required to verify signatures on a recall petition until the signatures submitted equal at least 10 percent of the total signatures required to qualify the recall for the ballot, as determined by the Secretary of State.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 180, Sec. 6.   (SB 117)   Effective August 24, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

11106.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), immediately after the deadline for submission of all signatures, the elections official shall verify any remaining signatures in the same manner set forth in subdivision (b) of Section 9031. This verification shall apply to all signatures submitted to each county elections official.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of this section and subdivision (b) of Section 9031, the elections official shall complete the verification of signatures
 within 30 days from the date of filing of the petition, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, if the Secretary of State determines that the time reasonably needed to complete the 60-day verification process described in subdivision (b) of Section 9031 and the procedures described in Sections 11108, 11109, and 11110, could cause the recall election to be ineligible for consolidation with the next regularly scheduled election, as permitted by Section 15 of Article II of the California Constitution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 870, Sec. 5.   (SB 386)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11107.

The elections official, upon the completion of each examination, shall forthwith attach to the petition a certificate, properly dated, showing the result of the examination, and submit a copy of the petition, except as to the signatures appended thereto, to the Secretary of State and file a copy of the certificate in his or her office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 714, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

11108.

(a) When the Secretary of State has received from one or more county elections officials a petition certified to have been signed by a sufficient number of registered voters to initiate a recall election, the Secretary of State shall, within 10 days, notify each county elections official of that fact.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, any voter who has signed a recall petition under this chapter shall have the voter’s signature withdrawn from the petition upon the voter filing a written request that includes the voter’s name, residence address, and signature with the elections official within 30 business days of the Secretary of State’s notice provided by subdivision (a).

(c) No later than 10 business
 days after the withdrawal period provided by subdivision (b), the elections officials shall report to the Secretary of State the total number of signatures that have been withdrawn pursuant to subdivision (b). The Secretary of State shall promptly make a second preliminary determination of whether the petitions have been signed by the sufficient number of registered voters to initiate a recall election. If the petitions have not been signed by a sufficient number of registered voters, the Secretary of State shall notify the county elections officials to continue to verify signatures pursuant to Section 11104. The Secretary of State and elections officials shall continue to make the notifications and reports required by this section until such time as the Secretary of State determines that there is a sufficient number of verified signatures, not including withdrawn signatures, to initiate a recall election.

(d) Upon receipt of the notification
 from the Secretary of State required in subdivision (c) that there is a sufficient number of verified signatures, not including withdrawn signatures, to initiate a recall election, the Department of Finance shall, in consultation with the affected elections officials and the Secretary of State, estimate the costs of the recall election, including expenses for verifying signatures, printing ballots and voter information guides, and operating polling places. The Department shall estimate the costs that would be incurred if (1) the recall election is held as a special election and (2) the recall election is consolidated with the next regularly scheduled election pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 15 of Article II of the California Constitution. Within 30 business days of receipt of the Secretary of State’s notice of sufficient signatures to initiate a recall required by subdivision (c), the Department of Finance shall submit the estimate to the Governor, the Secretary of State, and the Chairperson of the
 Joint Legislative Budget Committee.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law, the Secretary of State shall not certify the sufficiency of the signatures under Section 11109 until the Department of Finance has submitted the estimate required by subdivision (d) and either of the following has occurred:

(1) The Joint Legislative Budget Committee has had 30 days to review and comment on the estimate submitted by the Department of Finance pursuant to subdivision (d).

(2) The Legislature has appropriated funds that it determines are reasonably necessary to conduct the recall election and has designated funds for that purpose in the Budget Act or in another statute.

(f) The Secretary of State shall publish a copy of the estimate submitted by the Department of Finance
 on the Secretary of State’s public internet website no later than 21 business days after the day that the Secretary of State certifies the sufficiency of the signatures under Section 11109.

(g) After the Secretary of State has certified the sufficiency of the signatures under Section 11109, the Director of Finance, or the director’s designee, shall direct the Controller to remit to the elections official from those funds designated for that purpose in any budget act or other statute an amount that takes into consideration the amount of funds available for the purpose, the number of elections officials expected to conduct state recall elections held in that fiscal year, the Department of Finance’s estimates of the costs of each elections official to conduct each state recall election, and the amount reasonably necessary to conduct such recall election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 34, Sec. 3.   (SB 152)   Effective June 28, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

11109.

When the Secretary of State determines that the proponents have collected sufficient signatures, he or she shall certify that fact to the Governor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 714, Sec. 19.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

11110.

Upon receiving certification of the sufficiency of the recall petitions from the Secretary of State, the Governor shall make or cause to be made publication of notice for the holding of the election. Officers charged by law with duties concerning elections shall make all arrangements for the election. The election shall be conducted, returned, and the results declared, in all respects as are other state elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 714, Sec. 20.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Recall of Local Officers: Intermediate Steps in the Recall [11200. - 11242.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [11200. - 11201.]

11200.

This chapter shall apply to the recall of local officers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11201.

When the city or county elections official is the officer sought to be recalled, the duties imposed upon him or her shall be performed by some other person designated by the governing board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Recall Petitions [11220. - 11227.]

11220.

(a) A recall petition shall be submitted to the elections official for filing in his or her office during normal office hours as posted within the following number of days after the clerk or, in the case of a recall of a state officer, the Secretary of State, notifies the proponents that the form and wording of the petition meets the requirements of Article 3 (commencing with Section 11040) of Chapter 1:

(1) Forty days if the electoral jurisdiction has less than 1,000 registered voters.

(2) Sixty days if the electoral jurisdiction has less than 5,000 registered voters but at least 1,000.

(3) Ninety days if the electoral jurisdiction has less than 10,000 registered voters but at least 5,000.

(4) One hundred twenty days if the electoral jurisdiction has less than 50,000 registered voters but at least 10,000.

(5) One hundred sixty days if the electoral jurisdiction has 50,000 registered voters or more.

(b) For purposes of this section, the number of registered voters shall be that which was reported at the last report of registration by the county elections official to the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 2187 and prior to a finding of the elections official or Secretary of State that no alterations are required in the form of the recall petition pursuant to Section 11042.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11221.

The number of qualified signatures required in order to qualify a recall for the ballot shall be as follows:

(a) In the case of an officer of a city, county, school district, community college district, county board of education, or resident voting district, but not including a judge of a superior court, the number of signatures shall be equal in number to not less than the following percent of the registered voters in the electoral jurisdiction:

(1) Thirty percent if the registration is less than 1,000.

(2) Twenty-five percent if the registration is less than 10,000 but at least 1,000.

(3) Twenty percent if the registration is less than 50,000 but at least 10,000.

(4) Fifteen percent if the registration is less than 100,000 but at least 50,000.

(5) Ten percent if the registration is 100,000 or above.

(b) For purposes of this section, the number of registered voters shall be calculated as of the time of the last report of registration by the county elections official to the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 2187, and prior to the finding by the elections official or Secretary of State that no alterations are required in the form of the recall petition pursuant to Section 11042.

(c) (1) In the case of a state officer, including a judge of a court of appeal, and in the case of a judge of a superior
 court, the number of signatures shall be as provided for in subdivision (b) of Section 14 of Article II of the California Constitution. In the case of a judge of a superior court, which office has never appeared on the ballot since its creation, or did not appear on the ballot at its last election pursuant to Section 8203, the number of signatures shall be as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 14 of Article II of the California Constitution, except that the percentage shall be based on the number of votes cast within the judicial jurisdiction for the countywide office which had the least number of votes in the most recent general election in the county in which the judge holds office.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “countywide office” means an elective office wholly within the county which is voted on throughout the county.

(d) In the case of a landowner voting
 district, signatures of voters owning at least 10 percent of the assessed value of land within the electoral jurisdiction of the officer sought to be recalled.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 304, Sec. 8.   (AB 1513)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11222.

(a) The petition shall be filed by the proponents, or by any person or persons authorized, in writing, by a proponent. All sections of the petition shall be filed at the same time.

(b) When the petition is presented for filing, the elections official shall determine the total number of signatures affixed to the petition. If, from this examination, the elections official determines that the number of signatures, prima facie, equals or is in excess of the minimum number of signatures required, the elections official shall accept the petition for filing. The petition shall be deemed as filed on that date. A section of the petition not so filed is void
 for all purposes. If, from the elections official’s examination, the elections official determines that the number of signatures, prima facie, does not equal or exceed the minimum number of signatures required, the official shall not take further action.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 58, Sec. 12.   (AB 3259)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

11223.

If the petition was circulated in more than one county, the elections official of each county shall affix, with the certificate showing the results of his or her examination, the number of registered voters of the county residing within the electoral jurisdiction of the officer sought to be recalled.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11224.

(a) Except as provided in Section 11225, within 30 days from the date of filing of the petition, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, the elections official shall examine the petition, and from the records of registration, ascertain whether or not the petition is signed by the requisite number of voters. If the elections official’s examination shows that the number of valid signatures is greater than the required number, the elections official shall certify the petition to be sufficient. If the number of valid signatures is less than the required number, the elections official shall certify the petition to be insufficient.

(b) In determining
 the number of valid signatures, the elections official may check the signatures against facsimiles of voters’ signatures, provided that the method of preparing and displaying the facsimiles complies with law.

(c) The elections official shall attach to the petition a certificate showing the result of this examination, and shall notify the proponents of either the sufficiency or insufficiency of the petition.

(d) If the petition is found sufficient, the elections official shall certify the results of the examination
 to the governing board at its next regular meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 81.   (AB 1020)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Operative September 26, 2016, when the Secretary of State issued the certification prescribed by Stats. 2015, Ch. 728, Sec. 88.)
-------------------------------------------

11225.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), within 60 days from the date of filing of the petition, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, if, from the examination of petitions pursuant to Section 11222, more than 500 signatures have been signed on the petition, the elections official may use a random sampling technique for verification of signatures. The random sample of signatures to be verified shall be drawn in a manner so that every signature filed with the elections official shall have an equal opportunity to be included in the sample. The random sampling
 shall include an examination of at least 500 or 5 percent of the signatures, whichever is greater.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the elections official shall complete the verification of signatures within 30 days from the date of filing of the petition, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, and holidays, if the elections official determines that the time reasonably needed to complete the 60-day verification process described in subdivision (a) and any other procedures required for qualifying the measure for the ballot could cause the recall election to be ineligible for consolidation with the next regularly scheduled election, as provided in subdivision (b) of Section 11242.

(c) If the statistical sampling shows that the number of valid signatures is greater than 110 percent of the required number, the elections official shall certify the petition to be sufficient.

(d) If the statistical sampling shows that the number of valid signatures is within 90 to 110 percent of the number of signatures of qualified voters needed to declare the petition sufficient, the elections official shall examine and verify each signature filed.
 If the elections official’s examination of each signature shows that the number of valid signatures is greater than the required number, the elections official shall certify the petition to be sufficient. If the number of valid signatures is less than the required number, the elections official shall certify the petition to be insufficient.

(e) If the statistical sampling shows that the number of valid signatures is less than 90 percent of the required number, the elections official shall certify the petition to be insufficient.

(f) In determining from the records of registration the number of valid signatures signed on the petition, the elections official may check the signatures against facsimiles of voters’ signatures, provided that the method of preparing and displaying the facsimiles complies with law.

(g) The elections official shall attach to the petition, a certificate showing the result of this examination, and shall notify the proponents of either the
 sufficiency or insufficiency of the petition.

(h) If the petition is found insufficient, no action shall be taken on the petition. However, the failure to secure sufficient signatures does not preclude the filing later of an entirely new petition to the same effect.

(i) If the
 petition is found to be sufficient, the elections official shall certify the results of the examination to the governing body at its next regular meeting.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 870, Sec. 6.   (SB 386)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11226.

If the certificate shows that the petition is insufficient, no action shall be taken on it, but the petition shall remain on file.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11227.

If the elections official finds the signatures on the petition to be sufficient, he or she shall submit his or her certificate as to the sufficiency of the petition to the governing body at its next regular meeting. The certificate shall contain:

(a) The name of the officer whose recall is sought.

(b) The title of his or her office.

(c) The number of signatures required by law.

(d) The total number of signatures on the petition.

(e) The number of valid signatures on the petition.

(f) The number of signatures which were disqualified.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. The Recall Election [11240. - 11242.]

11240.

Within 14 days after the meeting at which the governing body received the certificate of sufficiency as specified in Section 11227, the governing body shall issue an order stating that an election shall be held pursuant to this article to determine whether or not the officer named in the petition shall be recalled.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11241.

If the governing board fails to issue the order within the time specified in Section 11240, the county elections official, within five days, shall set the date for holding the election. If the recall is to be voted on by voters in more than one county, the elections official of the county with the largest number of registered voters who will be voting in the election shall set the date for holding the election in consultation with the elections officials of the other counties.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11242.

(a) The election shall be held not less than 88, nor more than 125, days after the issuance of the order.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the election may be conducted within 180 days after the issuance of the order so that the election may be consolidated with a regularly scheduled election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 791, Sec. 6.   (AB 2584)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. General Procedures: Final Steps in the Recall [11300. - 11386.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [11300. - 11303.]

11300.

No insufficiency in a petition against any officer shall bar the later filing of a new petition against that officer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11301.

If a petition is found insufficient by the elections official or, in the case of the recall of a state officer, the Secretary of State, the petition signatures may be examined in accordance with Section Article 2 (commencing with Section 7924.100) of Chapter 2 of Part 5 of Division 10 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 97.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

11302.

(a) Except as described in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b), if a vacancy occurs in an office after a recall petition is filed against the vacating officer, the recall election shall nevertheless proceed.

(b) (1) Upon the occurrence of the vacancy, the elections official for each county in which a section of the recall petition has been filed shall immediately verify the signatures on the petition submitted to the elections official as of the date of the vacancy.

(2) If the elections official verifies that a sufficient number of signatures were filed as of the date of the vacancy, the recall
 election shall proceed.

(3) If the elections official verifies that an insufficient number of signatures, or no signatures, were filed as of the date of the vacancy, the recall election shall not proceed and a vacancy in the office that is the subject of the recall election shall be filled as otherwise provided by law.

(4) A person who was subject to a recall petition may not be appointed to fill the vacancy in the office that he or she vacated and that person may not be appointed to fill any other vacancy in office on the same governing board for the duration of the term of office of the seat that he or she vacated.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 591, Sec. 3.   (AB 1311)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

11303.

A voter who has signed a recall petition shall have their signature withdrawn from the petition upon filing a written request that includes the name or title of the petition and the voter’s name, residence address, and signature with the elections official prior to the day the petition section bearing the voter’s signature is filed. A written request made under this section shall not constitute a petition or paper for purposes of Section 104.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 166, Sec. 4.   (AB 2967)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Ballots [11320. - 11327.]

11320.

The following shall appear on the ballots at every recall election, except in the case of a landowner voting district, with respect to each officer sought to be recalled:

(a) The question “Shall [name of officer sought to be recalled] be recalled (removed) from the office of [title of office]?”

(b) Next to the foregoing question, the words “Yes” and “No” on separate lines with a voting target next to each.

(c) If the officer sought to be recalled holds a voter-nominated office, the officer may elect to have the officer’s party preference identified on the ballot. The officer shall inform the
 Secretary of State whether the officer elects to have a party preference identified on the ballot by the deadline for the officer to file an answer with the Secretary of State pursuant to Section 11023. The Secretary of State shall disseminate this information to all appropriate county elections officials. The statement of party preference shall appear immediately to the right of and on the same line as the officer’s name, or immediately below the officer’s name if there is not sufficient space to the right of the officer’s name, and shall appear in substantially the following form:

(1) If the officer stated a political party preference on the officer’s affidavit of registration, the statement shall read: “Party Preference:____” (inserting the name of the qualified political party stated on the affidavit of registration.) The listed political
 party preference shall be the political party preference stated on the officer’s affidavit of registration at the time the notice of intention is filed with the elections official pursuant to Section 11021.

(2) If the officer did not state a political party preference on the officer’s affidavit of registration, the statement shall read: “Party Preference: None.”

(3) If the officer elects not to have the officer’s political party preference identified on the ballot, or if the officer fails to inform the Secretary of State whether the officer elects to have a party preference identified on the ballot by the deadline for the officer to file an answer with the Secretary of State, the statement of party preference shall not appear on the
 ballot.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 10.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11322.

In addition to the material contained in Section 11320, the following shall appear on ballots at all recall elections for state officers:

(a) The names of the candidates nominated to succeed the officer sought to be recalled shall appear under each recall question.

(b) Following each list of candidates, the ballot shall provide one blank line with a voting target next to it.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 11.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11322.5.

(a) (1) In a recall election for a state officer, additional instructions shall be added to the ballot to communicate the following information:

 (A) That there are two contests on the ballot.

(B) That the two contests are separate and can be voted on independently.

(2) For purposes of subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1), the following instructions are recommended:

“You can vote for the recall question regardless of whether you vote for a replacement candidate.

 You can vote for a replacement candidate regardless of whether or how you vote on the recall question.”

 (b) The exact wording of the instructions shall be written by the elections official to conform to the actions required by the layout of the ballot.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 12.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11323.

A voter shall indicate, by completely selecting the voting target next to either “Yes” or “No,” their vote for or against the recall proposal, respectively.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 676, Sec. 13.   (AB 1219)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11324.

(a) The official responsible for preparing the ballot shall, at least 10 days before the recall election, mail a voter information guide to each registered voter of the electoral jurisdiction of the officer sought to be recalled.

(b) In the case of a recall of a state officer, the official responsible for preparing the voter information guide pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include in the voter information guide the report of estimated costs of the recall prepared by the Department of Finance pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 11108.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 180, Sec. 13.   (SB 117)   Effective August 24, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

11325.

(a) With the voter information guide there shall be mailed, for each officer whose recall is sought, a printed copy of the following:

(1) The statement of reasons for recall that appeared on the notice of intent to recall that was filed by the proponents of the recall with the elections official or, in the case of a state officer, with the Secretary of State.

(2) The answer to the statement of reasons for recall that was filed by the officer whose recall is sought with the elections official or, in the case of a state officer, with the Secretary of State, if an answer was filed.

(b) The printed copies of the statement and the answer to
 that statement shall be mailed with the voter information guide either in a document separate from the voter information guide or as part of the voter information guide. Both the statement and answer shall be printed on the same page, or on facing pages of the document, and shall be of equal prominence.

(c) If the recall of more than one officer is sought, the statement and answer for each officer shall be printed together and shall be clearly distinguished from those of any other officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 269, Sec. 4.   (AB 3258)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

11327.

An officer whose recall is being sought may file a statement with the elections official in accordance with Section 13307, to be sent to each voter, together with the voter information guide.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 422, Sec. 59.   (AB 2911)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Elections in General [11328. - 11329.]

11328.

A recall election shall be conducted, canvassed, and the results declared in substantially the manner provided by law for a regular election for the office.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11329.

One election is sufficient for the recall of several officers.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Recall Elections [11381. - 11386.]

11381.

Nominations of candidates to succeed the recalled officer shall be made in the manner prescribed for nominating a candidate to that office in a regular election insofar as that procedure is consistent with this article. The following exceptions shall be made to that procedure:

(a) For recalls of state officers, the nomination papers and the declaration of candidacy shall, in each case, be filed no less than 59 days prior to the date of the election and not before the day the order of the election is issued. The Secretary of State shall certify the names of the candidates to be placed on the ballot by the 55th day prior to the election.

(b) No person whose recall is being sought may be a candidate to succeed himself or herself at a recall election.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 790, Sec. 3.   (AB 2582)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11382.

There shall not be an election for a successor in a recall of a local officer pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 11200). If a majority of the votes on a recall proposal for a local officer are “Yes”, the officer is removed and the office shall be vacant until it is filled according to law, provided that the officer who was the subject of the recall election shall not be appointed to fill the vacancy in that office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 251, Sec. 1.   (AB 94)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11383.

If one-half or more of the votes at a recall election are “No”, the officer sought to be recalled shall continue in office.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1994, Ch. 920, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

11384.

Except as provided in Section 11382, if a majority of the votes on a recall proposal are “Yes”, the officer sought to be recalled shall be removed from office upon the qualification of the officer’s successor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 790, Sec. 5.   (AB 2582)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

11385.

If a state officer is recalled at a recall election, the candidate receiving the highest number of votes for the office shall be declared elected for the unexpired term of the recalled officer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 251, Sec. 2.   (AB 94)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

11386.

If the candidate who received the highest number of votes in a recall election for a state officer fails to qualify within 10 days after receiving the certificate of election, the office to which the candidate was elected shall become vacant and shall be filled according to law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 790, Sec. 7.   (AB 2582)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 12. PREELECTION PROCEDURES [12000. - 12327.]



CHAPTER 1. Proclamations And Election Orders [12000. - 12001.]

12000.
